Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska38-3417
Act; persons exempt.

The Genetic Counseling Practice
Act does not apply to:

(1) An individual licensed
under the Uniform Credentialing Act to practice a profession other than genetic
counseling when acting within the scope of his or her profession and doing
work of a nature consistent with his or her training, except that such individual
shall not hold himself or herself out to the public as a genetic counselor;

(2) An individual employed
by the United States Government or an agency thereof to provide genetic counseling
if he or she provides genetic counseling solely under the direction and control
of the organization by which he or she is employed;

(3) A genetic counseling intern if
genetic counseling performed by the genetic counseling intern is an integral
part of the course of study and is performed under the direct supervision
of a genetic counselor who is on duty and available in the assigned patient
care area and if the genetic counseling intern is designated by the title
genetic counseling intern; or

(4) An individual certified by the national genetic
counseling board or the national medical genetics board to provide genetic
counseling who permanently resides outside the state and is providing consulting
services within the state for a period of two months or less.

Laws 2012, LB831, § 17.